Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.050

Disposition of fees.

All fees provided for under this chapter shall be deposited in an account in the agricultural local fund and used for enforcing and carrying out the purpose and provisions of this chapter and chapter 16.57 RCW.

[ 2003 c 326 s 69; 1959 c 107 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.